Utah statutes.
17-43-305.   Responsibility for cost of services provided by local mental health authority.

If a local mental health authority, through its designated provider, provides any service described in Subsection 17-43-301(3)(b) to a person who resides within the jurisdiction of another local mental health authority, the local mental health authority in whose jurisdiction the person resides is responsible for the cost of that service if its designated provider has authorized the provision of that service.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 22, 2003 General Session

